Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2934
Restraining order, protection order, or criminal no-contact order; effect; court findings; court powers and duties.

(1) Whenever custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access is granted to a parent in a case in which domestic intimate partner abuse is alleged and a restraining order, protection order, or criminal no-contact order has been issued, the custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access order shall specify the time, day, place, and manner of transfer of the child for custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access to limit the child's exposure to potential domestic conflict or violence and to ensure the safety of all family members. If the court finds that a party is staying in a place designated as a shelter for victims of domestic abuse or other confidential location, the time, day, place, and manner of transfer of the child for custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access shall be designed to prevent disclosure of the location of the shelter or other confidential location.

(2) When making an order or parenting plan for custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access in a case in which domestic abuse is alleged and a restraining order, protection order, or criminal no-contact order has been issued, the court shall consider whether the best interests of the child, based upon the circumstances of the case, require that any custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access arrangement be limited to situations in which a third person, specified by the court, is present, or whether custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access should be suspended or denied.

(3) When required by the best interests of the child, the court may enter a custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access order that is inconsistent with an existing restraining order, protection order, or criminal no-contact order. However, it may do so only if it has jurisdiction and authority to do so.

(4) If the court lacks jurisdiction or is otherwise unable to modify the restraining order, protection order, or criminal no-contact order, the court shall require that a certified copy of the custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access order be placed in the court file containing the restraining order, protection order, or criminal no-contact order.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 15;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 63.